Utah statutes.
77-33-1.   Definitions.

As used in this act:

(1)  "Witness" means a person who is confined in a penal institution in any state and whose testimony is desired in another state in any criminal proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in any criminal action before a court.

(2)  "Penal institution" includes a jail, prison, penitentiary, house of correction, or other place of penal detention; and

(3)  "State" includes any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory of the United States.

